Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.202

Annexation/incorporation of fire protection district—Delay of transfer.

During the interim period, the governing body of the newly formed city or town and the board of fire commissioners may by written agreement delay the transfer of the district's assets and liabilities, and the city's or town's responsibility for the provision of fire protection, that would otherwise occur under RCW 35.02.190 or 35.02.200 for up to one year after the official date of incorporation. During the one-year period, the fire protection district may annex the city or town pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW and retain the responsibility for fire protection.

[ 1991 c 360 s 7.]